Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 10. Frauds - Statute of Frauds

38-10-101.
Conveyances to defraud.

Every conveyance of any estate or interest in the lands, or the rents and profits of lands, and every charge upon lands, or upon the rents and profits thereof, made or created with the intent to defraud prior or subsequent purchasers for a valuable consideration of the same lands, rents, or profits, as against such purchasers, shall be void.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 337, § 1.

G.L.

§ 1251.

G.S.

§ 1510.

R.S. 08:

§ 2655.

C.L.

§ 5100.

CSA:

C. 71, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-1.

38-10-102.
Purchaser with notice - prior grantee privy.

No such conveyance or charge shall be deemed fraudulent in favor of a subsequent purchaser, who has actual or legal notice thereof at the time of his purchase, unless it appears that the grantee in such conveyance or person to be benefited by such charge was privy to the fraud intended.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 338, § 2.

G.L.

§ 1252.

G.S.

§ 1511.

R.S. 08:

§ 2656.

C.L.

§ 5101.

CSA:

C. 71, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-2.

38-10-103.
Conveyance determinable at will of grantor void.

Every conveyance or charge of or upon any estate or interest in lands containing any provision for the revocation, determination, or alteration of such estate or interest, or any part thereof, at the will of the grantor shall be void as against subsequent purchasers from such grantor, for a valuable consideration, of any estate or interest so liable to be revoked, determined, or altered by such grantor, by virtue of the power reserved or expressed in such prior conveyance or charge.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 338, § 3.

G.L.

§ 1253.

G.S.

§ 1512.

R.S. 08:

§ 2657.

C.L.

§ 5102.

CSA:

C. 71, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-3.

38-10-104.
Power to revoke and reconvey.

When the power to revoke a conveyance of any lands or the rents and profits thereof and to reconvey the same is given to any person other than the grantor in such conveyance and such person thereafter conveys the same lands, rents, or profits to a purchaser for a valuable consideration, such subsequent conveyance shall be valid in the same manner and to the same extent as if the power of revocation were recited therein and the intent to revoke the former conveyance expressly declared.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 338, § 4.

G.L.

§ 1254.

G.S.

§ 1513.

R.S. 08:

§ 2658.

C.L.

§ 5103.

CSA:

C. 71, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-4.

38-10-105.
Conveyance before power vests.

If a conveyance to a purchaser under section 38-10-103 or 38-10-104 is made before the person making the same is entitled to execute his power of revocation, it shall nevertheless be valid from the time the power of revocation actually vests in such person, in the same manner and to the same extent as if then made.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 338, § 5.

G.L.

§ 1255.

G.S.

§ 1514.

R.S. 08:

§ 2659.

C.L.

§ 5104.

CSA:

C. 71, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-5.

38-10-106.
Conveyance - trust - power must be in writing.

No estate or interest in lands, other than leases for a term not exceeding one year, nor any trust or power over or concerning lands or in any manner relating thereto shall be created, granted, assigned, surrendered, or declared, unless by act or operation of law, or by deed or conveyance in writing subscribed by the party creating, granting, assigning, surrendering, or declaring the same, or by his lawful agent thereunto authorized by writing.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 338, § 6.

G.L.

§ 1256.

G.S.

§ 1515.

R.S. 08:

§ 2660.

C.L.

§ 5105.

CSA:

C. 71, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-6.

38-10-107.
Not to affect will or trusts by operation of law.

Section 38-10-106 shall not be construed to affect in any manner the power of the testator in the disposition of his real estate by a last will and testament nor to prevent any trust from arising or being extinguished by implication or operation of law.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 338, § 7.

G.L.

§ 1257.

G.S.

§ 1516.

R.S. 08:

§ 2661.

C.L.

§ 5106.

CSA:

C. 71, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-7.

38-10-108.
Contracts for interests in land - must be written.

Every contract for the leasing for a longer period than one year or for the sale of any lands or any interest in lands is void unless the contract or some note or memorandum thereof expressing the consideration is in writing and subscribed by the party by whom the lease or sale is to be made.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 339, § 8.

G.L.

§ 1258.

G.S.

§ 1517.

R.S. 08:

§ 2662.

C.L.

§ 5107.

CSA:

C. 71, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-8.

38-10-109.
Authorized agent may subscribe instrument.

Every instrument required to be subscribed by any party under section 38-10-108 may be subscribed by the agent of such party lawfully authorized by writing.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 339, § 9.

G.L.

§ 1259.

G.S.

§ 1518.

L. 1887:

P. 274, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2663.

C.L.

§ 5108.

CSA:

C. 71, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-9.

38-10-110.
Courts may enforce specific performance.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to abridge the powers of courts of equity to compel the specific performance of agreements in cases of part performance of such agreement.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 339, § 10.

G.L.

§ 1260.

G.S.

§ 1519.

R.S. 08:

§ 2664.

C.L.

§ 5109.

CSA:

C. 71, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-10.

38-10-111.
Trusts for use of grantor void against creditors.

All deeds of gift, all conveyances, and all transfers or assignments, verbal or written, of goods, chattels, or things in action, or real property, made in trust for the use of the person making the same shall be void as against the creditors existing of such person.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 339, § 11.

G.L.

§ 1261.

G.S.

§ 1520.

R.S. 08:

§ 2665.

L. 21:

P. 339, § 1.

C.L.

§ 5110.

CSA:

C. 71, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-11.

38-10-111.5.
Trusts to establish or maintain eligibility for certain public assistance void - exceptions.

Any trust established by or for a person that consists of the person’s individual assets, income, or property of any kind shall be void for the purpose of establishing or maintaining eligibility for any public assistance as provided by article 2 of title 26, C.R.S., or medical assistance as provided by articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S., unless the trust is established in accordance with the provisions of sections 15-14-412.6 to 15-14-412.9, C.R.S.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1604, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1836, § 16, effective January 1, 2001.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 2022, § 117, effective July 1.

38-10-112.
Void agreements.

Except for contracts for the sale of goods which are governed by section 4-2-201, C.R.S., and lease contracts which are governed by section 4-2.5-201, C.R.S., in the following cases every agreement shall be void, unless such agreement or some note or memorandum thereof is in writing and subscribed by the party charged therewith:

Every agreement that by the terms is not to be performed within one year after the making thereof;

Every special promise to answer for the debt, default, or miscarriage of another person;

Every agreement, promise, or undertaking made upon consideration of marriage, except mutual promises to marry.

Repealed.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 339, § 12.

G.L.

§ 1262.

G.S.

§ 1521.

R.S. 08:

§ 2666.

C.L.

§ 5111.

CSA:

C. 71, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-12.

L. 69:

P. 392, § 1.

L. 77:

(2) repealed, p. 340, § 47, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 321, § 5, effective July 1, 1992.

38-10-113.
Goods sold at auction - memorandum.

Whenever goods are sold at auction, and the auctioneer at the time of sale enters in a sale book a memorandum specifying the nature and price of the property sold, the terms of sale, the name of the purchaser, and the name of the person for whose account the sale is made, such memorandum shall be deemed a note of the contract of such sale within the meaning of section 38-10-112.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 339, § 13.

G.L.

§ 1263.

G.S.

§ 1522.

R.S. 08:

§ 2667.

C.L.

§ 5112.

CSA:

C. 71, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-13.

38-10-114.
No delivery or change of possession - effect.

Except as otherwise provided in section 4-2-402 or 4-2.5-308, C.R.S., or except where evidence of the transaction is included in the central registry maintained with respect to transactions relating to title to such goods and chattels, or is duly noted on the certificate of title to such goods and chattels by the authority issuing such certificate, or is included in the records of the proper filing office for a security interest in such goods and chattels under section 4-9-501, C.R.S., or is a transaction described in section 4-9-309 or 4-9-310, C.R.S., every sale made by a vendor of goods and chattels in his or her possession or under his or her control and every assignment of goods and chattels, unless each shall be accompanied by an immediate delivery and followed by an actual and continued change of possession of things sold or assigned, shall be presumed to be fraudulent and void as against the creditors of the vendor, or the creditors of the person making such assignment, or subsequent purchasers in good faith, unless the party opposed to the effect of the presumption shall establish that it is more probable than not that such sale or assignment was made by the seller or assignor in good faith and without any actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud creditors or subsequent purchasers.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 339, § 14.

G.L.

§ 1264.

G.S.

§ 1523.

R.S. 08:

§ 2668.

C.L.

§ 5113.

CSA:

C. 71, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-14.

L. 65:

P. 1481, § 3.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1446, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1689, § 2, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 321, § 6, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 1446, § 42, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

Amendments to this section by House Bill 91-1080 and Senate Bill 91-129 were harmonized.

38-10-115.
Creditors defined.

“Creditors”, as used in section 38-10-114, includes all persons who are creditors of the vendor or assignor at any time while such goods and chattels remain in his possession or control.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 340, § 15.

G.L.

§ 1265.

G.S.

§ 1524.

R.S. 08:

§ 2669.

C.L.

§ 5114.

CSA:

C. 71, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-15.

38-10-116.
Lawful agent may subscribe.

Every instrument required by any of the provisions of this article to be subscribed by any party may be subscribed by the lawful agent of such party.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 340, § 16.

G.L.

§ 1266.

G.S.

§ 1525.

R.S. 08:

§ 2670.

C.L.

§ 5115.

CSA:

C. 71, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-16.

38-10-117.
Conveyances to defraud creditors void.

Every conveyance or assignment in writing or otherwise of any estate or interest in lands, goods, or things in action or of any rents and profits issuing thereupon, and every charge upon lands, goods, or things in action or upon the rents and profits thereof made with the intent to hinder, delay, or defraud creditors or other persons of their lawful suits, damages, forfeitures, debts, or demands, and every bond or other evidence of debt given, suits commenced, or decree or judgment suffered with the like intent as against the person so hindered, delayed, or defrauded shall be void.

This section shall not apply to any transfer made or obligation incurred on or after July 1, 1991, and, for the applicability of this subsection (2), the time at which any such transfer or obligation is made or incurred shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of article 8 of this title.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 340, § 17.

G.L.

§ 1267.

G.S.

§ 1526.

R.S. 08:

§ 2671.

C.L.

§ 5116.

CSA:

C. 71, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-17.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1690, § 3, effective July 1.

38-10-118.
Grant or assignment of trust.

Every grant or assignment of any existing trust in lands, goods, or things in action, unless the same is in writing and subscribed by the party making the same or by his agent lawfully authorized, shall be void.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 340, § 18.

G.L.

§ 1268.

G.S.

§ 1527.

R.S. 08:

§ 2672.

C.L.

§ 5117.

CSA:

C. 71, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-18.

38-10-119.
Conveyances void against heirs.

Every conveyance, charge, instrument, or proceeding declared to be void by the provisions of this article as against creditors or purchasers shall be equally void against the heirs, successors, personal representatives, or assignees of such creditors or purchasers.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 340, § 19.

G.L.

§ 1269.

G.S.

§ 1528.

R.S. 08:

§ 2673.

C.L.

§ 5118.

CSA:

C. 71, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-19.

38-10-120.
Intent, question of fact - want of consideration.

The question of fraudulent intent, in all cases arising under the provisions of this article, shall be deemed a question of fact and not of law; nor shall any conveyance or charge be adjudged fraudulent against creditors or purchasers solely on the ground that it was not founded on a valuable consideration.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 340, § 20.

G.L.

§ 1270.

G.S.

§ 1529.

R.S. 08:

§ 2674.

C.L.

§ 5119.

CSA:

C. 71, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-20.

38-10-121.
Purchaser with notice of fraud.

The provisions of this article shall not be construed in any manner to affect or impair the title of a purchaser for a valuable consideration, unless it appears that such purchaser had previous notice of the fraudulent intent of his immediate grantor or of the fraud rendering void the title of such grantor.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 340, § 21.

G.L.

§ 1271.

G.S.

§ 1530.

R.S. 08:

§ 2675.

C.L.

§ 5120.

CSA:

C. 71, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-21.

38-10-122.
Construction of terms.

“Lands”, as used in this article, means lands, tenements, and hereditaments; and “estate and interest in lands” includes every estate and interest, freehold and chattel, legal and equitable, present and future, vested and contingent in lands as defined in this section.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 340, § 22.

G.L.

§ 1272.

G.S.

§ 1531.

R.S. 08:

§ 2676.

C.L.

§ 5121.

CSA:

C. 71, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-22.

38-10-123.
Term conveyance, how construed.

“Conveyance”, as used in this article, includes every instrument in writing, except a last will and testament, whatever may be its form and by whatever name it may be known in law, by which any estate or interest in lands is created, aliened, assigned, or surrendered.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 341, § 23.

G.L.

§ 1273.

G.S.

§ 1532.

R.S. 08:

§ 2677.

C.L.

§ 5122.

CSA:

C. 71, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 59-1-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 59-1-23.

38-10-124.
Credit agreements - required to be in writing.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Credit agreement” means:

A contract, promise, undertaking, offer, or commitment to lend, borrow, repay, or forbear repayment of money, to otherwise extend or receive credit, or to make any other financial accommodation;

Any amendment of, cancellation of, waiver of, or substitution for any or all of the terms or provisions of any of the credit agreements defined in subparagraphs (I) and (III) of this paragraph (a); and

Any representations and warranties made or omissions in connection with the negotiation, execution, administration, or performance of, or collection of sums due under, any of the credit agreements defined in subparagraphs (I) and (II) of this paragraph (a).

“Creditor” means a financial institution which offers to extend, is asked to extend, or extends credit under a credit agreement with a debtor.

“Debtor” means a person who or entity which obtains credit or seeks a credit agreement with a creditor or who owes money to a creditor.

“Financial institution” means a bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, credit union, or mortgage or finance company.

Notwithstanding any statutory or case law to the contrary, including but not limited to section 38-10-112, no debtor or creditor may file or maintain an action or a claim relating to a credit agreement involving a principal amount in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars unless the credit agreement is in writing and is signed by the party against whom enforcement is sought.

A credit agreement may not be implied under any circumstances, including, without limitation, from the relationship, fiduciary or otherwise, of the creditor and the debtor or from performance or partial performance by or on behalf of the creditor or debtor, or by promissory estoppel.

History.

Source:
L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1438, § 1, effective March 15.

L. 2013:

(1)(d) amended,(SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1489, § 71, effective July 1.